Utah statutes.
34A-2-803.   Violation of judgments, orders, decrees, or provisions of
chapter -- Grade of offense.
(1) An employer, employee, or other person is guilty of a misdemeanor if that
employer, employee, or other person violates this chapter or Chapter 3, Utah
Occupational Disease Act, including:
(a)  doing any act prohibited by this chapter or Chapter 3, Utah Occupational
Disease Act;
(b)  failing or refusing to perform any duty lawfully imposed under this
chapter or Chapter 3, Utah Occupational Disease Act;
(c)  failing, neglecting, or refusing to obey any lawful order given or made
by the commission, or any judgment or decree made by any court in connection
with the provisions of this chapter or Chapter 3, Utah Occupational Disease
Act.
(2)  Every day during which any person fails to observe and comply with any
order of the commission, or to perform any duty imposed by this chapter or
Chapter 3, Utah Occupational Disease Act, shall constitute a separate and
distinct offense.
